District of Columbia statutes.
42-3220

Action in debt may be brought for rent in arrears under lease or demise for life.

It shall and may be lawful for any person or persons, having any rent in arrear, or due upon any lease or demise for life or lives, to bring an action or actions of debt for such arrears of rent, in the same manner they might have done, in case such rent were due, and reserved upon a lease for years.

8 Ann, ch. 14, § 4, 1709
Kilty’s Rep. 248
Alex. Br. Stat. 682
Comp. Stat. D.C., 325, § 42
1981 Ed., § 45-1420.
1973 Ed., § 45-922.